Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.030

Director powers and duties.

It is the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs of the department under the control of the director in order that the director may institute therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its business that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director has complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such administrative structures as the director considers appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ such assistants and personnel as necessary for the general administration of the department. This employment shall be in accordance with the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

[ 2005 c 333 s 3.]